apertium-mar-eng.mar.dix
    <pardef n="व्यक्ती__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>मधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींमधून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>    
    </pardef>
 
   <pardef n="मेज__n_m"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ावर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ावरुन</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांवर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांवरुन</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="खुर्च/ी__n_f"> 
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीत</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीतून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यात</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांतून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="आवाज__n_m"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ात</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ातून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="पक्ष/ी__n_m"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यात</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यातून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांत</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांतून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="आज__n"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>च्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>च्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="वर्ष__n"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ात</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ातून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याचा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याची</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांचा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांची</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="पाण/ी__n">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यात</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यातून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांत</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांतून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="व्यक्ती"><i>व्यक्ती</i><par n="व्यक्ती__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मेज"><i>मेज</i><par n="मेज__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आवाज"><i>आवाज</i><par n="आवाज__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पक्षी"><i>पक्ष</i><par n="पक्ष/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राणी"><i>प्राण</i><par n="पक्ष/ी__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="आज"><i>आज</i><par n="आज__n"/></e>
    <e lm="काल"><i>काल</i><par n="आज__n"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहेर"><i>बाहेर</i><par n="आज__n"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्ष"><i>वर्ष</i><par n="वर्ष__n"/></e>
    <e lm="पाणी"><i>पाण</i><par n="पाण/ी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="चंद्र"><i>चंद्र</i><par n="मेज__n_m"/></e>
